Arkansas, session 2025, HB1912.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1122(a)(1), concerning the
definitions to be used with respect to the assessment of property and
Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 79, is amended to read as follows:
(1) “Assessed value” means twenty fifteen percent (20%) (15%) of
the appraised value of the real property;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-26-1123(a), concerning the sale of real
property, is amended to read as follows:
(a) When a person sells his or her real property, the county assessor
shall assess the real property at twenty fifteen percent (20%) (15%) of the
*JLL357*
03/31/2025 11:04:45 AM JLL357

HB1912
appraised value at the next assessment date after the date of the transfer of
title to the real property.

SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. Sections 1 and 2 of this act are effective
for assessment years beginning on or after January 1, 2026.































03/31/2025 11:04:45 AM JLL357